Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-2,242.05
Cultivated-protein food product, defined.

Cultivated-protein food product means a food product having one or more sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue originating from an agricultural food animal but that, in lieu of being derived from meat processing, is derived from manufacturing cells, including processes in which one or more stem cells that were initially isolated from an agricultural food animal, are grown in vitro, and may be manipulated, as part of a manufacturing operation.

Laws 2025, LB246, § 3.